North Carolina, session 2025, HB4.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 115C-12 is amended by adding the following new subdivisions
to read:
"(50) Medical Condition Action Plan. – The State Board of Education shall adopt a
rule establishing a medical condition action plan as provided in
G.S. 115C-375.1 to be implemented by each public school unit for each
student at risk for a medical emergency as diagnosed by a doctor.
(51) Medical Emergency Plan. – The State Board of Education, in consultation
with the Department of Public Instruction and the Department of Health and
Human Services, shall adopt a rule establishing the required response of
public school unit employees when a student has a medical emergency not
otherwise covered by a medical condition action plan implemented in
accordance with G.S. 115C-375.1. The Department of Public Instruction shall
provide each public school unit with a copy of the rule, and each public school
unit shall implement the rule."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 115C-375.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-375.1. To provide some medical care to students.students and implement medical
condition action plans.
(a) Notwithstanding G.S. 90-21.10B, it is within the scope of duty of teachers, including
substitute teachers, teacher assistants, student teachers, or any other public school employee
when authorized by the board of education governing body of a public school unit or its designee,
(i) to administer any drugs or medication prescribed by a doctor upon written request of the
parents, or as described in the medical condition action plan required by subsection (b) of this
section, (ii) to give emergency health care when reasonably apparent circumstances indicate that
any delay would seriously worsen the physical condition or endanger the life of the pupil, student,
and (iii) to perform any other first aid or lifesaving techniques in which the employee has been
trained in a program approved by the State Board of Education. At least one public school unit
employee per school shall be trained in first aid and lifesaving techniques, including seizure
recognition. No public school unit employee, however, other than a school administrator, shall
be required to administer drugs or medication or attend lifesaving techniques programs.
(b) Each governing body of a public school unit shall implement the medical condition
action plan adopted by the State Board of Education pursuant to G.S. 115C-12(50) for each
*H4-v-3*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
student at risk of a medical emergency as diagnosed by a doctor. The medical condition action
plan adopted by the State Board of Education shall include all of the following:
(1) A standard medical condition action plan form.
(2) Detailed instructions in the medical condition action plan form to ensure that
all individuals designated by the principal, or, if there is no principal, the staff
member with the highest decision-making authority, to provide medical care
for a student at risk for a medical emergency as diagnosed by a doctor, know
how to address the medical emergency.
(3) Information detailing the method by which and by whom any medical
emergency will be handled when the student is at a school-sponsored activity
that is not on the campus of the public school unit, including field trips and
interscholastic athletic activities.
(c) Any public school unit employee, authorized by the board of education governing
body of a public school unit or its designee to act under (i), (ii), or (iii) above, subsections (a)
and (b) of this section, shall not be liable in civil damages for any authorized act or for any
omission relating to that act unless the act or omission amounts to gross negligence, wanton
conduct, or intentional wrongdoing. Any person, serving in a voluntary position at the request of
or with the permission or consent of the board of education governing body of a public school
unit or its designee, who has been given the authority by the board of education governing body
of a public school unit or its designee to act under (ii) above give emergency health care when
reasonably apparent circumstances indicate that any delay would seriously worsen the physical
condition or endanger the life of the student shall not be liable in civil damages for any authorized
act or for any omission relating to the act unless the act amounts to gross negligence, wanton
conduct, or intentional wrongdoing.
(d) At the commencement of each school year, but before the beginning of classes, and
thereafter as circumstances require, the principal of each school school, or, if there is no principal,
the staff member with the highest decision-making authority, shall determine which persons will
participate in the medical care program."
SECTION 1.(c) The State Board of Education may adopt temporary rules to
implement this section.
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 115C-47 is amended by adding the following new subdivisions
to read:
"(70) To Implement a Medical Condition Action Plan. – Local boards of education
shall implement the medical condition action plan adopted by the State Board
of Education under G.S. 115C-12(50) and as provided in G.S. 115C-375.1.
(71) To Implement a Medical Emergency Plan. – Local boards of education shall
implement the medical emergency plan adopted by the State Board of
Education under G.S. 115C-12(51)."
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 115C-218.75 is amended by adding the following new
subsections to read:
"(e3) Medical Condition Action Plan. – A charter school shall implement the medical
condition action plan adopted by the State Board of Education under G.S. 115C-12(50) and as
provided in G.S. 115C-375.1.
(e4) Medical Emergency Plan. – A charter school shall implement the medical emergency
plan adopted by the State Board of Education under G.S. 115C-12(51)."
SECTION 2.(c) G.S. 115C-238.66 is amended by adding the following new
subdivisions to read:
"(7h) Medical condition action plan. – A regional school shall implement the
medical condition action plan adopted by the State Board of Education under
G.S. 115C-12(50) and as provided in G.S. 115C-375.1.
Page 2 House Bill 4-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(7i) Medical emergency plan. – A regional school shall implement the medical
emergency plan adopted by the State Board of Education under
G.S. 115C-12(51)."
SECTION 2.(d) G.S. 116-239.8(b) is amended by adding the following new
subdivisions to read:
"(26) Medical condition action plan. – A laboratory school shall implement the
medical condition action plan adopted by the State Board of Education under
G.S. 115C-12(50) and as provided in G.S. 115C-375.1.
(27) Medical emergency plan. – A laboratory school shall implement the medical
emergency plan adopted by the State Board of Education under
G.S. 115C-12(51)."
SECTION 2.(e) Subdivision (2) of Section 6(d) of S.L. 2018-32 is amended by
adding the following new sub-subdivisions to read:
"p. (70) [To Implement a Medical Condition Action Plan].
q. (71) [To Implement a Medical Emergency Plan]."
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year.
House Bill 4-Third Edition Page 3